Washington statutes.
RCW 15.28.020

Commission composition—Voting—Quorum.

The commission is composed of seventeen voting members, as follows: Ten producers, four dealers, and two processors, who are appointed as provided in this chapter. The director, or an authorized representative, shall be a voting member of the commission. Other sections of this chapter that relate to the selection of voting members shall not apply to the director or his or her authorized representative.

A majority of the voting members constitute a quorum for the transaction of any business.

[ 2003 c 396 s 13; 2002 c 313 s 105; 1967 c 191 s 1; 1961 c 11 s 15.28.020. Prior: (i) 1947 c 73 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2901-11. (ii) 1947 c 73 s 9; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-18. (iii) 1947 c 73 s 13, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 2909-22, part.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2003 c 396: See note following RCW 15.66.030.

Effective dates—2002 c 313: See note following RCW 15.65.020.

Effective date—1967 c 191: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect immediately: PROVIDED, That section 5 of this 1967 amendatory act shall not take effect until July 1, 1968." [ 1967 c 191 s 9.]